Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1521
Reports; form; contents; Secretary of State; duties.

(1) The report required by section 76-1520 shall be on a form provided by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State may incorporate the form with other forms required to be filed by entities identified in subsection (1) of section 76-1520. If there has been no change in the information contained in the previous report filed by the reporting entity, the reporting entity may so indicate in a space provided on the reporting form for that purpose.

(2) The Secretary of State shall include a list of exemptions to the prohibitions contained in Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska and a means by which persons filing the form may indicate, if applicable, which exemptions apply to the reporting entity. The reporting entity may include or attach a statement indicating the basis upon which the reporting entity claims exemption from the prohibitions contained in Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(3) The Secretary of State shall annually prepare a report indicating the total number of entities reporting under sections 76-1520 to 76-1524, the number of entities reporting as a corporation, as a limited partnership, as a limited liability partnership, as a limited liability company, and as a trust and the basis upon which the reporting entities claim exemption from the prohibitions contained in Article XII, section 8, of the Constitution of Nebraska. The Secretary of State shall deliver the report to the Clerk of the Legislature on or before January 1 each year.

Laws 1998, LB 1193, § 2.